Hawaii, session 2026, HB1776.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii faces a severe housing crisis, and that approximately fifty-six per cent of the renters in the State are rent burdened, meaning over thirty per cent of their income is dedicated to paying their rent.  Many of these households are increasingly vulnerable to housing cost-burden, insecurity, and displacement. The legislature further finds that federal and state laws afford tenants certain protections and rights, including but not limited to laws that: (1)  Safeguard public health, safety, and welfare by setting forth minimum dwelling unit standards; (2)  Establish rights and responsibilities of tenants and landlords; (3)  Establish processes related to residential evictions; and (4)  Protect tenants from discrimination based on certain classifications. The legislature also finds that landlord-tenant laws are self-help laws that put the onus on renters to access their rights through private action. This often presents major barriers to justice for tenants who are often already overwhelmed, under-resourced, and fearful of retaliation.  Without legal expertise, many renters may struggle to understand and access their rights as articulated in their lease agreements and under the Residential Landlord-Tenant Code. The legislature believes that providing accessible and accurate information to tenants concerning existing laws that protect tenants, the rights afforded under such laws, and the resources available to assist tenants will enable renters to address certain challenges and potentially assist them to avoid eviction and homelessness.  The legislature further believes that promoting access to accurate information will also improve housing stability across the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require the office of consumer protection to periodically publish an accessible, multilingual notice of tenant rights; and (2)  Require a landlord to provide a tenant with the most recent notice of tenant rights in the tenant's preferred language, if available, upon the signing of a lease. SECTION 2.  Chapter 521, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§521-A  Notice of tenant rights; publication.  (a) The office of consumer protection shall develop, maintain, and periodically publish a notice of tenant rights that summarizes the rights of tenants under this chapter and any other applicable federal or state law.  The notice of tenant rights shall be made available as a standalone document and included in the informational handbook on this chapter that is maintained by the office of consumer protection. (b)  The notice of tenant rights shall at a minimum be: (1)  Made available in printed and electronic formats; (2)  Translated into the most commonly spoken languages in the State, as determined by the office of consumer protection, in consultation with the office of language access; and (3)  Accessible to individuals with disabilities, including compliance with applicable accessibility standards for electronic documents. (c)  The office of consumer protection shall review and update the notice of tenant rights no less than once every year, or sooner as necessary to reflect changes in the applicable law." SECTION 3.  Chapter 521, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§521-B  Notice of tenant rights; disclosure.  (a)  A landlord shall provide a tenant with a copy of the most recently issued notice of tenant rights, either physically or digitally, published by the office of consumer protection pursuant to section 521-A at or before the time the tenant signs a written rental agreement.  The landlord shall provide the copy in the tenant's preferred language, if the notice is available in that preferred language from the office of consumer protection. (b)  A landlord who fails to comply with this section shall be subject to a fine of no more than $          ." SECTION 4.  In codifying the new sections added by sections 2 and 3 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 6.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.